North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-08 Honey Assessments

4.1-08-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Beekeeper” means any person owning or controlling a colony of bees for the production of honey, beeswax, or byproducts.

“Commissioner” means the agriculture commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8.

4.1-08-02.
Assessment.

An annual assessment in the amount of ten cents is imposed on each colony of honeybees licensed by the beekeeper. The minimum annual assessment is one dollar.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8; 2011, ch. 65, § 1; 2015, ch. 69, § 1.

4.1-08-03.
Submission of assessments — Civil penalty.

Each beekeeper shall submit the assessment required by section 4.1-08-02 to the commissioner at the same time the beekeeper submits the license application required by section 4.1-16-02.

If a beekeeper fails to submit the assessment as required by this section, the commissioner may impose a penalty equal to five percent of the amount due, plus interest at the rate of six percent per annum from the due date.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8; 2015, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

4.1-08-04.
Refunds.

To receive a refund of any assessment paid in accordance with this chapter, a beekeeper shall obtain an application form from the commissioner within sixty days from the date the commissioner received the assessment required by section 4.1-08-02.

The beekeeper shall return the completed form to the commissioner within ninety days from the date the commissioner received the assessment required by section 4.1-08-02.

A beekeeper is not entitled to a refund under this section unless the refundable amount meets or exceeds five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8.

4.1-08-05.
Continuing appropriation.

The commissioner shall forward all moneys received under this chapter to the state treasurer for deposit in a special fund known as the honey fund. All moneys in the honey fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the commissioner to carry out this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8.

4.1-08-06.
Assessment — Authorized expenditures.

The assessment required by this chapter may be used to fund research, including efforts that focus on honeybee colony health; education programs; and market development efforts, as well as promotional efforts such as the North Dakota honey queen program.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8; 2011, ch. 65, § 2; 2015, ch. 69, § 2.

4.1-08-07.
Commissioner — Powers.

The commissioner may:

Expend moneys appropriated under this chapter for the purposes set forth in section 4.1-08-06, provided the commissioner first consults with the board of directors of the North Dakota beekeepers’ association; and

Do all things necessary and proper to enforce and administer this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8; 2011, ch. 65, § 3; 2015, ch. 69, § 3.

4.1-08-08.
Biennial report — Information regarding honey assessments.

When compiling the biennial report required by section 54-06-04, the commissioner shall provide information regarding activities under this chapter, including the amount of assessments collected and the manner in which the moneys were expended.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8.

4.1-08-09.
Penalty.

Any person willfully violating this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 80, §
8.